District of Columbia statutes.
7-244

Disclosures to a service provider.

(a)

Before an agency or service provider discloses health and human services information to a service provider pursuant to this chapter, the receiving service provider shall make a written request for the information, describing the health and human services information sought and the purpose for the information.

(b)

Regarding requests for health and human services information from a service provider, an agency or service provider must maintain an accurate record, for a reasonable period of time:

(1)

Of the date and purpose for any request for the information;

(2)

The date on which the information was disclosed; and

(3)

A record of to whom the information was disclosed.

Dec. 4, 2010, D.C. Law 18-273, § 104, 57 DCR 7171
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 53(a), 59 DCR 6190
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 211(a) of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-582, October 20, 2010, 57 DCR 10118).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 104 of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-582, October 20, 2010, 57 DCR 10118).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 104 of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-530, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8099).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 validated a previously made technical correction.